Wyoming, session 2025, HB0215.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(i), (iii), (xi), (xiv),
(xxii), (xlii), (xliii), (xlix) and by creating new
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
paragraphs (lv) and (lvi), 22-3-111 by creating a new
subsection (c), 22-6-115, 22-6-121(a)(intro), 22-6-122,
22-6-130(a), 22-8-102, 22-8-107, 22-8-108(a), (b) and (c),
22-8-115(a), by creating a new subsection (b) and by
amending and renumbering (b) as (c), 22-9-109(a),
22-9-125(d)(intro), 22-11-101.1(a), 22-11-102,
22-11-103(a)(iii), (vii), (viii) and (c), 22-11-104(a),
(b)(intro), (ii)(intro), (A), (iii) and (v), 22-11-105,
22-11-106, 22-12-101 by creating a new subsection (c),
22-12-103, 22-12-107(a)(v) and (vi), 22-12-112, 22-12-114,
22-12-115, 22-13-103(b), 22-13-107, 22-13-110, 22-14-102,
22-14-104, 22-14-110, 22-14-111(a)(viii), 22-14-113,
22-14-114(a), 22-15-105(a), 22-15-109, 22-16-103(c)(i) and
by creating a new subsection (e), 22-16-118, 22-21-109,
22-22-203(b), 22-26-101(a)(ii), (iv) and (vi), 22-26-103,
22-26-105 and 22-26-107(a)(intro) and by creating a new
paragraph (v) are amended to read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(i) "Automatic Tabulating equipment" means
apparatus that automatically examines and counts votes
recorded on any equipment used by a person in the hand
counting process to examine paper ballots or ballot cards
and tabulates tabulate the results. "Tabulating equipment"
shall not include any equipment that can be connected to
the internet in any manner or that has any type of
communication ability;

(iii) "Ballot card box" means a ballot that can
be counted using automatic tabulating equipment secure
container in which paper ballots are placed for hand
counting by qualified election judges;

(xi) "Counting center" is the location or
locations designated by the county clerk for the automatic
manual tabulating and counting of ballots;

(xiv) "Electronic Hand count voting system" is a
system employing an electronic voting device in conjunction
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
with for the hand counting of paper ballots or ballot
cards, or other system of secret voting and automatic
tabulating equipment for the recording, tabulating and
counting of votes in an election;

(xxii) "Pollbook" means a book, or hardware,
software or any combination thereof commonly referred to as
an electronic pollbook, used in a polling place on election
day containing information specified by law. "Pollbook"
shall not include any hardware or software that can be
connected to the internet in any manner;

(xlii) "Recount" is the processing of ballots
through the hand tabulation system for an additional time
or times, conducted for the specific purpose of counting
votes again in any specific race, based upon the criteria
of W.S. 22-16-109 or 22-16-111;

(xliii) "Retabulation" is the process of running
tabulating ballots back through the hand tabulation system
for an additional time or times for the express purpose of
reconciling the count;

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(xlix) "Vote center" means a polling place at
which any registered elector in the political subdivision
holding the election may vote, regardless of the precinct
in which he resides, connected through secure internet
connections to provide voting information to and receive
voting information from the electronic pollbook maintained
by the county clerk and used as an option to traditional
polling places at the discretion of the county clerk;

(lv) "Canvassing board" means the persons
appointed to certify the results of an election after the
counting board has counted ballots;

(lvi) "Counting board" means the persons
appointed to count the ballots after the polls close, or in
a mail ballot election, to count the ballots after the
deadline passes.

22-3-111. Preparation and contents of pollbooks.

(c) No electronic pollbook shall be used by any
qualified election judge for an election. Nothing in this
subsection shall prohibit a county clerk from using an
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
electronic system for the purpose of preparing pollbooks
for use in elections.

22-6-115. Specifications for paper ballots.

(a) Official paper ballots shall be uniform in size,
printed in black ink on good quality paper through which
printing cannot be read. Ballots shall be white except as
otherwise provided. On a voting machine Each column or row
containing the titles of offices and candidates for office
shall be arranged to indicate clearly the office for which
a candidate is running. Ballots shall be formatted to
facilitate hand tabulation.

(b) Blank ballots specifically designed for an
accessible voting machine in accordance with the Help
America Vote Act shall be obtained from the vendor of
accessible voting machine. The voting machine shall produce
ballots that can be read by human election workers.
Unreadable bar codes or quick response codes that cannot be
deciphered by human election workers shall not be printed
on the ballot.

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
22-6-121. Political party ballot position on general
election ballot; order of candidates' names.

(a) Political party position shall be determined on
the general election ballot according to the number of
votes received by each party within the county for the
office of representative in congress at the last preceding
general election. The party receiving the highest number
of votes shall appear first following the names of the
offices to be voted for and other parties shall follow in
the order of their respective numbers of such votes. The
order of any provisional parties will be drawn by the
secretary of state. Any independent candidates shall
appear following the last party and shall be listed in
alphabetical order, subject to rotation. When more than
one (1) candidate is to be elected to a particular office,
the names of candidates shall be printed in alphabetical
order, subject to rotation, on all ballots. for electronic
and machine voting systems as defined by W.S. 22-1-102.

22-6-122. Rotation of candidates' names; equal lines
on voting machines.

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
The names of candidates for each office shall be rotated on
all ballots by precinct for all elections. In each county
the name of each candidate shall appear substantially an
equal number of times at the top, at the bottom, and in
each intermediate place. In a voting machine polling place,
if candidates for the same office occupy more than one (1)
line on the voting machine, the number of names appearing
on each line shall be as nearly equal as possible.

22-6-130. Post-election ballot audit.

(a) Each county clerk shall complete an audit of the
county's unofficial election results by identifying and
reviewing the smallest observable percentage between the
statewide candidates who received the most votes and the
statewide candidates who received the second highest votes
for each contest within the county not later than the first
Thursday following a primary, special or general election.
Not later than five (5) days before the audit the county
clerk shall notify the county chairman of each political
party with a candidate on the ballot of the audit, and any
independent candidate on the ballot, stating the time and
place of the audit under this subsection. Representatives
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
of each political party, and representatives of any
independent candidate, may be present for the audit.
Additional contests may be added to the audit at the
discretion of the county clerk. Using a formula developed
by the University of Wyoming, each county clerk shall use
the smallest observable percentage to determine a
statistically significant sample size of the ballots to be
audited under this section. To ensure the timely completion
of this procedure under this subsection, The number of
ballots audited shall not exceed be not less than five
percent (5%) of the total number of ballots cast.

22-8-102. Qualifications.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, judges of
election and members of counting boards shall be registered
electors and shall be physically, morally and mentally
competent to perform their duties. The county clerk may
appoint persons who are at least sixteen (16) years of age
to serve as judges of election or members of counting
boards if such persons meet all other requirements for
qualification of an elector. A judge of election shall not
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
be a member of a counting board at the same election except
as provided by W.S. 22-8-108(d).

22-8-107. Absentee ballot counting boards.

If the alternate procedure for counting absentee ballots
described in W.S. 22-9-125 is used, at least three (3) four
(4) judges shall be appointed as an absentee ballot
counting board in the same manner as other election judges
are appointed and shall hand count ballots using the same
counting method as provided in W.S. 22-14-104(b). These
judges shall determine legality of absentee ballots and
count absentee ballots or in the case of electronic voting
systems, the ballots shall be counted at the designated
counting center.

22-8-108. Appointment, composition and authority of
counting boards; when judges to count.

(a) The county clerk shall appoint a counting board
for each paper ballot polling place casting more than three
hundred (300) votes at the last general election, and may
appoint a counting board in such a polling place in which
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
one hundred fifty (150) or more such votes were cast at
such election. A counting board shall have three (3) four
(4) members or more to facilitate the counting of votes and
shall hand count ballots using the same counting method as
provided in W.S. 22-14-104(b). No more than one (1) person
under the age of eighteen (18) may be appointed as to each
counting board.

(b) A counting board shall be appointed for each
designated counting center. in each county using an
electronic voting system. The Additional counting boards
may be appointed by the county clerk depending on the
number of ballots to be counted. Each board shall consist
of at least seven (7) five (5) members who shall be the
county clerk or his designated deputy designee, and three
(3) two (2) members of each major political party having a
candidate on the ballot appointed by the county clerk from
a list of registered electors pursuant to W.S. 22-8-101(b).
Additional members may be appointed by the county clerk if
deemed necessary by the county clerk but equal major party
membership shall be assured. No more than one (1) person
under the age of eighteen (18) may be appointed as to each
counting board. The counting board shall hand count ballots
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
using the same counting method as provided in W.S.
22-14-104(b).

(c) The counting board in a paper ballot polling
place has no authority to act until polls are declared
closed as provided in W.S. 22-13-117, except as provided in
W.S. 22-9-125(d). A counting board in an electronic voting
system counting center may commence preparing absentee
ballots for counting at any time on election day, or before
election day as provided in W.S. 22-9-125(d).

22-8-115. Oath for election officials.

(a) An Each election official and election judge
shall subscribe to this oath verbally and in writing before
entering upon his duties at each election:

"I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will impartially
and to the best of my knowledge and ability perform
discharge the duties of my office an election
official/election judge according to the law, and that I
will not disclose how any elector has voted unless I am
required to do so as a witness in a proper judicial
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
proceeding. I will make no statement nor provide any
information that in any way would reveal the actual or
estimated vote count prior to the close of the polls on
election day. I will studiously endeavor to prevent all
frauds, deceit and abuse in the application of the election
laws of this state."

(b) Each election observer shall subscribe to this
oath verbally and in writing before entering upon his
duties at each election:

"I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will make no
statement nor provide any information that in any way would
reveal the actual or estimated vote count prior to the
close of the polls on election day."

(b)(c) The oath oaths under this section shall be
taken before the county clerk, his deputy or a previously
sworn judge of election.

22-9-109. Form of absentee ballot.

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(a) The absentee ballot shall be in the same form
prescribed by law for the official ballot or, for the
transmission of Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act ballots only, a reasonable printed reproduction
of the prescribed form for electronic ballots.

22-9-125. Alternate procedures for collecting and
counting absentee ballots.

(d) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section
and any other mandatory procedures for counting absentee
ballots under this chapter, the county clerk may choose to
prepare and process absentee ballots the Thursday or Friday
immediately preceding election day, provided:

CHAPTER 11
HAND COUNT VOTING SYSTEMS

22-11-101.1. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter, "Vendor" means a person
engaged in selling, leasing, marketing, designing, building
or maintaining electronic voting systems "Hand count voting
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
system" is a system for casting, tabulating, recording and
reporting election results to the state or counties using
manual hand counting of paper ballots and ensuring a proper
chain of custody of paper ballots.

22-11-102. Use authorized; purchase or lease.

The board of county commissioners of each county may adopt
for use, either experimentally or permanently, in any
election in any or all polling places within the county,
any electronic hand count voting system authorized by law.

22-11-103. Capabilities required.

(a) Every electronic hand count voting system adopted
for use in Wyoming shall:

(iii) Permit voting either by paper ballot, by
ballot card or by other mechanical, magnetic or electrical
means by which a vote may be recorded; or by voting on an
accessible voting machine for voters with disabilities,
subject to the following:

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(A) Each polling place shall have at least
one (1) accessible voting machine in accordance with the
Help America Vote Act;

(B) An accessible voting machine under this
paragraph shall:

(I) Be limited to a machine that can
assist a voter with marking a paper ballot and shall not be
used to tabulate votes;

(II) Not be connected to the internet
or able to be connected to the internet in any manner or
have any other type of communication ability;

(III) Comply with rules adopted by the
secretary of state specifying requirements for accessible
voting machines and shall be tested before each election.
Before testing the accessible voting machines under this
subdivision, the county clerk shall notify the county
chairman of each political party having a candidate on the
ballot, stating the time and place of the test. The
political party representatives and representatives of
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
independent candidates may be present for the test, which
shall be held at least two (2) weeks before the election.
The test shall ascertain that the accessible voting
machines will accurately record the votes cast for all
offices and all measures. The test shall be conducted by
processing a pre-audited group of paper ballots on which
are recorded a predetermined number of valid votes for each
candidate and on each measure. During the test a different
number of votes shall be assigned to each candidate for
each office, and for and against each measure. If any error
is detected, the cause of it shall be ascertained and
corrected and an errorless count shall be secured and
certified by the county clerk before the test can be
certified. Additionally, accessibility functions, such as
the audio and keypad shall be tested and verified to be in
working order. On completion of the count, the programs,
test materials and ballots shall be sealed and retained as
provided for paper ballots. Rules adopted by the secretary
of state under this subdivision shall ensure accessible
voting machines comply with the Help America Vote Act and
any other applicable requirements under law.

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(vii) Provide automatic tabulating equipment
which shall Reject choices recorded on a ballot exceeding
the number allowed, and at a primary election, reject
choices for candidates from a party other than the party
for which a preference is expressed;

(viii) Be suitably designed to function safely,
efficiently and accurately, when properly operated, Provide
assistance in the accurate hand recording, tabulating and
counting of every vote cast;

(c) The secretary of state may from time to time as
necessary promulgate rules and regulations consistent with
subsection (a) of this section and with all other
requirements of this Election Code to govern the
characteristics of electronic hand counting voting systems
that may be used in Wyoming. The rules shall ensure the
fairness and accuracy of elections. The rules may govern
both the characteristics of the systems and the procedures
to be followed in using the systems. The rules shall allow
the county clerks to follow appropriate recommendations of
the vendors of the systems for maintenance and management
of the systems to the extent these recommendations adopt
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
hand counting voting procedures that are not inconsistent
with this Election Code and with the rules. The rules
shall be adopted following consultation with the county
clerks.

22-11-104. Conduct of elections in which hand count
voting systems utilized.

(a) All provisions of the Election Code governing the
conduct of elections shall apply to elections in which
electronic hand count voting systems are used, except that
the county clerk of any county in which an electronic a
hand count voting system is used may make such
modifications in ballot form as are necessary to facilitate
the use of the electronic hand count voting system and yet
maintain the integrity of the election and the intent of
the law.

(b) The county clerk of each county using an
electronic a hand count voting system shall:

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(ii) Before the day of election deliver to each
polling place using an electronic a hand count voting
system:

(A) A sufficient number of voting devices
hand count tabulation and recording forms and ballots;

(iii) Before testing an electronic voting system
for an each election, notify the county chairman of each
political party having a candidate on the ballot, stating
the time and place of the a test of the hand counting,
tabulating and reporting procedure that will be used in the
county. The political party representatives and
representatives of independent candidates may be present
for the test, which shall be held at least two (2) weeks
before the election. The test shall ascertain that the
automatic tabulating equipment paper ballots and the hand
counting, tabulating and reporting procedure that will be
used in the county will accurately count the votes cast for
all offices and all measures. The test shall also
demonstrate the chain of custody of paper ballots including
the use of ballot boxes, tally sheets, tally summary sheets
and ballot box keys. The test shall be conducted by
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
processing a preaudited group of paper ballots. or ballot
cards on which are recorded a predetermined number of valid
votes for each candidate and on each measure and shall
include for each office one (1) or more ballots which have
votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order to
test the ability of the automatic tabulating equipment to
reject such votes. During the test a different number of
valid votes shall be assigned to each candidate for an
office, and for and against each measure. If any error is
detected, the cause of it shall be ascertained and
corrected and an errorless count shall be secured and
certified to by the county clerk. On completion of the
count, the programs test, all test materials and ballots
shall be sealed and retained as provided for paper ballots;

(v) Provide adequate security for the delivery
of all ballots to the a designated counting center, if
applicable;

22-11-105. Spoiled ballots.

Any voter who spoils his paper ballot or ballot card may
return it and secure a replacement. The word "Spoiled"
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
shall be written across the face of the voided ballot, and
it shall be placed in an envelope for spoiled ballots.
Spoiled ballots shall be delivered with the returns to the
county clerk.

22-11-106. Procedure after voter marks paper ballot.

After marking the paper ballot, the voter shall place the
ballot in the voting machine. If the votes are being
counted at a central counting center as authorized by W.S.
22-14-114(b), the voter shall instead place the paper
ballot in the ballot box.

22-12-101. Designation and notice of polling places;
external location; change in location.

(c) The county clerk shall establish a private area
in each polling place for the hand counting of ballots.

22-12-103. Furnishing of booths.

The county clerk in all elections shall furnish each
polling place with sufficient booths, paper ballots or
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
voting machines and supplies to permit convenient and
secret marking of ballots.

22-12-107. Materials for judges.

(a) Before election day the county clerk shall cause
to be delivered to one (1) of the judges of election in
each polling place the following materials:

(v) Accessible voting machines, where to the
extent required by W.S. 22-11-103(a)(iii);

(vi) The number of ballots required by law and
any related hand tabulation equipment or supplies;

22-12-112. Procedure for preparing ballots and ballot
boxes for use.

Before the polls open the judges shall compare ballots on
the voting machines with the sample ballots and return
sheets to see that they are correct., place the voting
machine in a proper position free from obstruction and
assure that the face of the machine may be viewed clearly
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
by the voter casting the ballot but not by others.
Envelopes containing keys shall not be opened if the
numbers and records on them do not correspond to the
numbers and records on the machine ballot box. If the
numbers do not agree, the machine ballot box shall be
reexamined and certified by the county clerk. before it may
be used.

22-12-114. Certification of ballots and ballot box
keys.

The judges shall certify that ballot box keys are
delivered, that numbers on registering counters and seals
correspond with those on key envelopes, that counters are
set at zero (00000) or counts certified, that ballots are
proper. and that the machines are ready for voting.

22-12-115. Examination of ballot box.

Before the polls are open, the judges of election shall
open and examine the ballot box to determine that it is
empty and relock it. The ballot box shall not again be
opened until the polls are closed, except when necessitated
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
by operation of the voting equipment at the direction of
the county clerk required by law and only in the presence
of two (2) or more election judges with different political
party affiliations. It The ballot box shall not be removed
from the presence of the judges of election or counting
board until all ballots are counted and recorded.

22-13-103. Preservation of order; privacy of voting
booths and machines.

(b) To protect the privacy of the voter, voting
booths and voting machines shall be kept clear of all
persons except voters marking ballots and election
officials discharging their duties.

22-13-107. Spoiled or rejected ballots.

(a) An elector spoiling a paper ballot by mistake or
accident may receive another ballot by returning the
rejected ballot to a judge of election. Spoiled ballots
shall immediately be cancelled by a judge of election, the
word "spoiled" shall be written across the face of the
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
ballot and the ballot shall be delivered with the returns
to the county clerk or official conducting the election.

(b) A ballot may be rejected as provided in this
subsection. For any rejected ballot, the word "rejected"
shall be written across the face of the voided ballot and
the ballot shall be placed in an envelope for rejected
ballots. Rejected ballots shall be delivered with the
returns to the county clerk. Ballots shall be rejected and
not counted if any of the following apply:

(i) The initials of proper election judges are
missing from the ballot;

(ii) The number of votes on the ballot for all
offices and all questions exceed the number authorized by
law;

(iii) The ballot is an absentee ballot without
completed and signed affidavit;

(iv) The ballot was voted with unlawful
assistance as provided by law.
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558

22-13-110. Write-in votes.

Write-in votes may be entered on a voting machine in the
manner indicated by instructions posted on the voting booth
or indicated on the voting machine on paper ballots shall
be verified and tallied at a polling place or counting
center as provided in W.S. 22-14-110 and 22-14-114(b).

22-14-102. Who may be present after all votes are
cast and polls close; making pollbooks agree; counting
votes.

(a) After all the votes are cast and the polls are
officially declared closed, only election judges and
election observers under oath shall be permitted in a
polling place.

(b) When all ballots are cast, the machine shall be
locked against further voting and sealed as prescribed by
law. Except as otherwise provided by Subject to W.S.
22-14-114(b), election judges shall commence to count at
the polling place shall begin hand counting and recording
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
of votes one (1) hour before the closing of the polls and
shall continue without adjournment until counting is
completed.

22-14-104. Entry of paper ballot votes.

(a) Paper ballots shall be opened by the counting
board and every vote for a candidate or ballot proposition
shall be entered on a list hand counted as provided in this
section. A vote which is not clearly marked shall not be
tallied for that office or question but votes clearly
marked on the remainder of the ballot shall be tallied.

(b) Paper ballots shall be counted and recorded
subject to the following:

(i) Counting shall be conducted by two (2)
counting teams consisting of two (2) election judges each.
Each member of each counting team shall be from a different
political party;

(ii) One (1) counting team shall designate one
(1) judge to read each vote and the second judge shall
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
observe to verify that the vote was read correctly. Any
write-in candidate shall be read by calling out the
applicable office and then the name written in on the
ballot for that office;

(iii) Each member of the second counting team
shall record each vote as it is read on separate tally
sheets, including any write-in votes;

(iv) When all votes are counted in the precinct,
the four (4) election judges shall transfer the totals of
all tally sheets, including any write-in votes, onto a
summary tally sheet. The results on the summary tally sheet
shall be provided to the county clerk.

(c) The secretary of state may adopt rules for the
hand counting of paper ballots in accordance with this
section and this Election Code.

22-14-110. Sealing paper ballots and voting machine
records.

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
Paper ballots shall be sealed by the election judges in an
envelope after being counted and tallied, unless the
ballots are being counted at a central counting center as
authorized by W.S. 22-14-114(b). One (1) copy of each
voting machine record shall be sealed in a separate
envelope showing the district, precinct and machine number
and endorsed by the election judges. These envelopes shall
then be sealed in a single large container. The district
and precinct number shall be written on each container.

22-14-111. Returning records and returns to clerk.

(a) Unless the votes are being counted at a central
counting center as authorized by W.S. 22-14-114(b), an
election judge or peace officer as defined under W.S.
7-2-101(a)(iv)(A) or (B) and acting under the authority of
the county clerk shall, as soon as possible after the
tabulation of votes is complete, return to the clerk who
prepared the ballots for the election the following records
and returns in a sealed and locked container with a
numbered seal that includes a number or other identifier
that is unique to that seal:

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(viii) Oaths of judges of election judges and
election observers;

22-14-113. Return of voting supplies.

(a) Keys to voting machines ballot boxes shall be
returned to the county clerk in an envelope sealed and
signed by an election judge and endorsed by an election
judge of a different political party affiliation. On this
envelope shall be recorded the number of the seal with
which the machine was closed.

(b) All voting supplies, ballot boxes and accessible
voting machines shall be returned to the county clerk as
soon as possible after the vote has been returned.

22-14-114. Counting of write-in votes; transporting
of ballots.

(a) For ballots designed to be counted by machine,
each individual vote shall be determined by the voting
equipment and shall not be determined subjectively by human
tabulation except when the intent of the voter is
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
unmistakable but the ballot was received in such damaged,
soiled, or other condition that it is rejected by the
machine. The secretary of state may promulgate rules
establishing standards for counting such ballots. For
ballots not designed to be counted by machine, only votes
clearly marked, as provided by W.S. 22-14-104 and rules
promulgated pursuant to this code, shall be tallied. For
write-in votes, names which that are misspelled or
abbreviated or the use of nicknames of candidates shall be
counted for the candidate if the vote is obvious to the
counting board or election judges. The secretary of state
may by rule specify standards for counting write-in votes
under this subsection.

22-15-105. Challenged person may vote; generally.

(a) If a person offering to vote is challenged, and
the challenge is not resolved in accordance with W.S.
22-15-106, an election judge shall offer the voter a ballot
clearly marked "provisional." and which cannot be
automatically tabulated Provisional ballots shall be
securely stored separately from other ballots and shall
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
only be counted as provided in subsection (d) of this
section.

22-15-109. Election observers; certification;
qualification; authority; removal.

(a) The county chairman of each political party may
certify poll watchers election observers prior to the day
of the election to serve in each polling place. Not more
than one (1) poll watcher election observer from each
political party may serve simultaneously unless the chief
judge determines that one (1) additional poll watcher
election observer from each political party may be
accommodated in the polling place without disrupting the
polling process.

(b) A poll watcher An election observer shall belong
to the political party he represents, and shall be a
registered elector residing in the county. A poll watcher
and shall subscribe to an oath as provided in W.S.
22-8-115(b). An election observer shall serve only at the
polling place designated on the certificate. A poll watcher
An election observer is authorized to observe voter turn
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
out, and voter registration and hand tabulation procedures
and may make written memoranda but shall not challenge
voters or election judges, conduct electioneering
activities or disrupt the polling or counting process.

(c) The chief judge may remove a poll watcher an
election observer from the polling place for disturbing the
polling place, or for any other violation of the Election
Code.

22-16-103. County canvass procedures.

(c) The county canvassing board shall:

(i) Meet as soon as all returns have been
received and abstracted, but if any provisional ballots
have been cast in the county, not before the time has
passed for provisional voters to document their eligibility
to register or to vote. The board shall meet at a time and
place designated by the county clerk, but no earlier than
the second Friday following the election and no later than
the first fourth Friday following the election;

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(e) The county canvassing board shall not certify the
election if there are any outstanding irregularities in any
precinct.

22-16-118. Meeting of state canvassing board.

The state canvassing board shall meet no later than the
second Wednesday following the election certification of
all county elections. The secretary of state shall send a
messenger to obtain official county abstracts not filed in
a reasonable length of time. The canvassing board shall
meet at the time and place set by the secretary of state.
The board shall review the state abstracts prepared by the
secretary of state, compare them with the tabulation and
materials prepared by the secretary of state, resolve any
tie votes, and certify the abstract as the official state
canvass. The state canvassing board shall not certify the
election if there are any outstanding irregularities in any
county.

22-21-109. Supplies; regulations; costs.

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
The county clerk may utilize voting machines or electronic
voting systems shall use hand counted paper ballots at any
bond election and may prescribe the form of the ballot, the
duties of election officials, and other reasonable
regulations pertaining thereto. The political subdivision
holding the bond election shall pay the actual costs of the
election or an equitably proportioned share of a concurrent
election, as determined by the county clerk.

22-22-203. Determining validity of application;
placement on ballot; procedure for multi-county districts.

(b) Each county clerk in each election involving a
school or community college district which crosses county
boundaries shall determine whether voting machines,
electronic voting system, use paper ballots, or a
combination thereof, shall be used and hand count results
to insure ensure that each qualified elector votes only for
the candidate or candidates from the school district and
trustee residence area, if any, and from the community
college district and subdistrict, if any, for which he is
entitled to vote.

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
22-26-101. Felony offenses generally.

(a) The following acts in connection with or related
to the election process or an election, if knowingly and
willfully committed, are felony offenses punishable by not
more than five (5) years' imprisonment in the state
penitentiary or a fine of not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00), or both:

(ii) Unlawful opening of interference with a
ballot box as provided in W.S. 22-26-103;

(iv) Unlawful possession of a ballot box key as
provided in W.S. 22-26-105;

(vi) Falsifying election documents or results;

22-26-103. Unlawful interference with ballot box.

(a) Unlawful opening of interference with a ballot
box consists of any of the following:

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(i) Opening a ballot box or inspecting or
removing the contents thereof without lawful authority;, or

(ii) An election judge knowingly causing or
permitting any ballot to be in the ballot box at the
opening for the polls and before voting commences;

(iii) An election judge knowingly placing or
permitting any ballot, or paper having the semblance of a
ballot, to be placed in a ballot box at any election unless
the ballot is offered by a qualified elector as provided by
law;

(iv) Knowingly removing any legal ballot from a
ballot box for the purpose of changing the true and lawful
count of any election or in any other manner knowingly
changing the true and lawful count of any election;

(v) Knowingly placing or attempting to place or
causing to be placed any false or fraudulent ballot in a
ballot box at any election;

HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558
(vi) On the day of an election, willfully
concealing, breaking or destroying any ballot box used or
intended to be used at an election or willfully concealing
or removing any ballot box from the custody of the election
judges;

(vii) Conspiring with others so to open
interfere with a ballot box under this section.

22-26-105. Unlawful possession of key.

Unlawful possession of a key consists of the possession at
any time of a key to a voting machine or ballot box, or
making a duplicate thereof, unless authorized by law.

22-26-107. Falsifying election documents or results.

(a) Falsifying election documents or results consists
of performing any of the following acts with the intent to
deceive or mislead an elector or an election official:

(v) Falsifying hand tabulation results or tally
sheets.
HB0215

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0558

Section 2. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxiv) and (liv),
22-3-113(b), 22-6-113, 22-9-121(c)(ii), 22-9-125(b),
22-10-101 through 22-10-111, 22-11-103(a)(iv), (vi), (xi)
and (d) through (g), 22-11-104(b)(i), (iv), (vi), (vii) and
(c), 22-11-107 through 22-11-109, 22-12-110, 22-12-113,
22-13-109, 22-13-112, 22-14-105, 22-14-111(a)(i),
22-26-101(a)(iii) and 22-26-104 are repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0215